Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0568.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 2c. (1) To implement and enforce this act, the bureau may charge hospitals, nursing homes, homes for the aged, and adult foster care facilities with capacity for more than 6 adults operation and maintenance inspection fees. and To implement and enforce this act, the bureau may charge hospitals and schools plan review and construction inspection fees as provided in this section. (2) Fees charged under subsection (1) shall must be deposited in the general fund in a restricted account. The fees collected under this act and placed in the restricted account shall must be used only to fund the services for which the fees were collected and shall must remain in the restricted account at the end of the fiscal year. (3) The fees charged under this section shall must be established in a fee schedule contained in each fiscal year's appropriations act for the department. (4) At the beginning of each fiscal year, the department may increase the fees collected under this act by a percentage amount equal to not more than the average percentage wage and salary increase granted for that fiscal year to classified civil service employees employed by the department. (5) If the department increases the fees collected under subsection (1), the increase is effective for that fiscal year. The department shall use the increased fees as the basis for calculating fee increases in subsequent fiscal years. (6) By August 1 of each year the department shall provide a complete schedule of fees to be collected under this act for the following fiscal year to all of the following: (a) The director of the department of technology, management, and budget. (b) The chairperson of the house appropriations committee. (c) The chairperson of the senate appropriations committee. (7) As used in this section, "adult foster care facility with capacity for more than 6 adults" means an adult foster care congregate facility, or an adult foster care large group home, as those terms are defined in section 3 of the adult foster care facility licensing act, 1979 PA 218, MCL 400.703. "Adult foster care facility with capacity for more than 6 adults" includes an adult foster care small group home, as that term is defined in section 3 of the adult foster care facility licensing act, 1979 PA 218, MCL 400.703, with capacity for more than 6 adults.